Utah statutes.
65A-14-202.   Reservation of economic interests -- Agreement to negotiate in
good faith.
(1)  The right of a person to engage in an act of bioprospecting in this state
is subject to the state's reservation of any right the state may have to an
economic benefit derived from:
(a)  the act of bioprospecting;
(b)  a microorganism, plant, or fungus removed from a natural environment in
the state; or
(c)  information concerning a microorganism's, plant's, or fungus' physical or
genetic properties removed from a natural environment in the state.
(2)  A person may not engage in an act of bioprospecting in this state if the
person, as part of the registration required under Section 65A-14-201, does
not agree in writing to negotiate in good faith with the state if the state
asserts an economic interest described in Subsection (1).
